California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The legislative body shall have the power, in its discretion, to determine that the payment of such assessments of fifty dollars ($50) or more may be made in annual installments, in any event not to exceed 10, and that the payment of assessments so deferred shall bear interest on the unpaid balance at a rate to be determined by the legislative body, not to exceed 7 percent per annum. Said interest shall begin to run on the 31st day after the confirmation of the assessments by the legislative body. All such determinations may be expressed by resolution of the legislative body at any time prior to the confirmation of the assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 986.)
-------------------------------------------

5895.1.

If bonds are to be issued to represent the security of the unpaid assessments, upon confirmation of the report by the legislative body the superintendent of streets shall give notice to pay by mail and by publication substantially in the manner provided by Sections 4320 and 4321. The period for payment in cash stated therein shall be 30 days following the confirmation of the report. Upon completion of such cash payment period, the superintendent of streets shall file with the county recorder a certificate substantially in the form set out in Section 5891, giving notice therein that interest is payable at a rate to be fixed upon the sale of bonds, which rate shall not exceed
 7 percent per annum. Thereafter the provisions of Part 5 of this division shall be applicable and payments on assessments at bond shall be made as therein provided. Such bonds may be issued and sold as the legislative body directs and may be dated at any time after the expiration of the cash payment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Construction Outside of Jurisdiction [5895.50. - 5895.54.]

5895.50.

Whenever the property, which fronts on an area where improvements are required to be constructed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, lies entirely or partially within a city or unincorporated territory of a county and the improvement area or portions thereof lie within one or more other cities or unincorporated territory of one or more other counties, the superintendent of streets of any city or county having jurisdiction over all or a portion of the area to be improved shall have full authority to serve notices, to construct, and to do all work contemplated by Article 2 (commencing with Section 5875) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 5890) of this chapter, notwithstanding the fact that the property fronting on the improvement area lies entirely or partially within another city or unincorporated territory of another county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

5895.51.

Whenever a block, on which improvements are required to be constructed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, lies within a city or unincorporated territory of a county and within one or more other cities or unincorporated territory of one or more other counties, the superintendent of streets of any city or county having jurisdiction over a part of the block shall have full authority to serve notices, to construct, and to do all work contemplated by Article 2 (commencing with Section 5875) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 5890) of this chapter in that portion of the block lying in the territory of another jurisdiction after the superintendent obtains consent from the legislative body of that jurisdiction.

The consent of the legislative body shall be given by resolution adopted by a majority vote of the body’s membership. Thereafter, except as provided in Section 5895.54, the city or county whose superintendent of streets obtained the consent shall have jurisdiction over such areas for the purpose of sidewalk or curb construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

5895.52.

The city or county proceeding under the provisions of this article may pay for such work out of the road fund or any other fund available for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

5895.53.

The legislative body of the city or county which undertakes the construction of improvements pursuant to the provisions of this article shall have the authority to levy an assessment to pay the cost of any such construction of improvements, notwithstanding the fact that the improvements or the property fronting on the improvements lies outside the territory of the city or county. Such assessment shall be levied, shall be a lien, and shall be collected in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 5890) of this chapter. The assessments so collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city or county under whose authority the improvements were constructed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

5895.54.

Nothing contained in this article shall limit in any manner the police power of any city or county with reference to any sidewalk or curb contructed under the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 28. Conversion of Existing Overhead Electric and Communication Facilities to Underground Locations [5896.1. - 5896.17.]

5896.1.

The Legislature finds that, in many areas of the state, landowners, cities, public agencies, and public utilities desire to convert existing overhead electric and communication facilities to underground locations by means of special assessment proceedings. The Legislature hereby declares that a public purpose will be served by providing a procedure to accomplish this conversion and that it is in the public interest to provide for the conversion by proceedings taken pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.2.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases, and any variants thereof, are defined as follows:

“Cable operator” has the same meaning as defined in Section 5830 of the Public Utilities Code.

“Cable television service” has the same meaning as “cable service” as defined in Section 5830 of the Public Utilities Code.

“Communication service” means the transmission of intelligence by electrical means, including, but not limited to, telephone, telegraph, messenger-call, clock, police, fire alarm, and traffic control circuits, and circuits for the transmission of television or radio signals.

“Convert” or “conversion” means the removal of
 all, or any part, of any existing overhead electric or communication facilities and the replacement thereof with underground electric or communication facilities constructed at the same or different locations.

“Electric service” means the distribution of electricity for heat, light, or power.

“Electric or communication facilities” means any works or improvements used or useful in providing electrical, cable television, or communication service, including, but not limited to, poles, supports, tunnels, manholes, vaults, conduits, pipes, wires, conductors, guys, stubs, platforms, crossarms, braces, transformers, insulators, cutouts, switches, capacitors, meters, communication circuits, appliances, attachments, and appurtenances, other than those owned or used by, or provided for, any railroad or pipeline, and located upon or above the right-of-way of the railroad or pipeline. “Electric facilities” does not include any
 facilities used or intended to be used for the transmission of electric energy at nominal voltages in excess of 35,000 volts.

“Overhead electric or communication facilities” means electrical, cable television, or communication facilities located, in whole or in part, above the surface of the ground.

“Underground electric or communication facilities” means electrical, cable television, or communication facilities located, in whole or in part, beneath the surface of the ground.

“Public agency” means any city, county, district, or public corporation (other than the one conducting the proceedings) that provides electric or communication service to the public by means of electric or communication facilities.

“Public utility” means any person or corporation that provides electric or communication service to the public by means of electric or
 communication facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 792, Sec. 2.   (AB 1145)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.3.

In addition to proceedings for types of work or improvement authorized elsewhere in this division, proceedings may be taken for the conversion of existing electric or communication facilities and the construction, reconstruction or relocation of any other electric or communications facilities which may be incidental thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.4.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by this chapter, a proceeding for a conversion shall be conducted and completed in accordance with the procedure specified elsewhere in this division. All of the provisions of this division shall be applicable to a proceeding for a conversion. This chapter does not affect any other law relating to the same or any similar subject, but provides an alternative authority and procedure for the subject to which it relates. When proceeding under this chapter its provisions only need be followed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.5.

Proceedings for a conversion shall be initiated by either a petition or by a determination of the legislative body.

(a) In order to initiate proceedings, a petition shall:

(1) Describe the proposed assessment district, as provided in Section 5181.

(2) Generally describe the proposed conversion.

(3) Request that proceedings for such conversion be taken pursuant to this division.

(b) In order to initiate proceedings, the legislative body shall determine that the city, a public utility, or a
 cable operator has voluntarily agreed to pay over 50 percent of all costs of conversion, excluding costs of users’ connections to underground electric or communication facilities.

(c) The city shall not pay a different percentage of the costs of conversion incurred by a public utility and by a cable operator associated with the same proceeding. The payment shall be made on a nondiscriminatory basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 792, Sec. 3.   (AB 1145)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.6.

A petition for proceedings for conversion shall be signed by not less than five owners of assessable land in the proposed assessment district, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll used by the city, owning lands constituting more than one-half of the area of all assessable lands within the proposed assessment district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.7.

The petition shall be filed with the clerk, who shall thereupon check or cause said petition to be checked. If the petition is signed by the requisite number of qualified signers, the clerk shall execute a certificate of sufficiency and present said petition and certificate to the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.8.

Upon presentation of the petition and certificate of sufficiency or upon a determination pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5896.5, the legislative body may adopt a resolution declaring its intention to order the conversion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 148.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.9.

(a) In a proceeding for a conversion, the city and any public utility, cable operator, or public agency supplying electric service, cable television service, or communication service within the city, by agreement, may provide that, upon confirmation of the assessment, the public utility, cable operator, or public agency shall have legal title to the electric or communication facilities, which shall thereafter constitute part of a system of the public utility or public agency and be used, operated, maintained, and managed by it as part of its system.

(b) Subject to any rules, regulations, or tariffs applicable to any public utility, cable operator, or public agency, the agreement also may provide, among other things, for any
 of the following: the supplying or approval by the public utility, cable operator, or public agency of plans and specifications; a contribution of labor, materials, or money by the public utility, cable operator, or public agency; the performance by the public utility, cable operator, or public agency of all, or any part, of the work or improvement; and payment to the public utility, cable operator, or public agency for any work or improvement performed or service rendered by it.

(c) Any agreement shall be made prior to the adoption of the resolution ordering the work. If the proceedings are abandoned, the agreement shall be given no further force or effect. To the extent that the agreement provides that all, or any part, of the work or improvement is to be performed by the public utility, cable operator, or public agency, the provisions of this division requiring competitive bidding and the award of the contract to the lowest responsible
 bidder shall be inapplicable.

(d) Nothing in this chapter precludes the city, cable operator, or the public utility, in the event of disagreement regarding any provision of the proposed agreement, from seeking review of the disagreement by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 792, Sec. 4.   (AB 1145)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.10.

If the work or improvement consists solely of a conversion, and the work or improvement is performed by a public utility, cable operator, or public agency, the resolution of intention shall provide that (a) the warrant, assessment, and diagram or (b) any bonds issued or to be issued to represent unpaid assessments, or both (a) and (b), shall be sold as the legislative body directs. The purchaser, and any successors, shall have the same rights and liens as the contractor to collect and enforce the assessments and all bonds issued to represent unpaid assessments. If the work and improvement consists, in part, of a conversion and, in part, of other types of work or improvement under this division, the legislative body may provide, in the resolution of intention, that
 the costs and expenses of conversion are part of the incidental expenses to be advanced to the city by the contractor and to be included in the assessment. Any payments made upon assessments, any proceeds from the sale of the warrant, assessment, and diagram or bonds, and any incidental expenses so advanced to the city may be used by the city for the purpose of making payments to a public utility, cable operator, or public agency pursuant to an agreement made under Section 5896.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 792, Sec. 5.   (AB 1145)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.11.

If the city furnishes electric or communication service by means of electric or communication facilities owned or operated by the city, the legislative body, in the resolution ordering work, may provide that the work or improvement of conversion shall be performed for the price or prices specified in the resolution by the city or any department, agency, commission, or officer of the city having the duty of furnishing the service. To that extent, the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 1100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code requiring competitive bidding and the award of the contract to the lowest responsible bidder shall be inapplicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.13.

If the work or improvement consists solely of conversion of electric or communication facilities owned or operated by the city and the legislative body has provided that such work or improvement shall be performed by the city or any department, agency, commission or officer of the city, the warrant, assessment and diagram and all bonds issued to represent unpaid assessments shall be delivered to the city and the city shall thereupon have the same rights and liens as the contractor to collect and enforce the payment of the assessments and all bonds issued to represent unpaid assessments. In such event, (a) such warrant, assessment and diagram or (b) any bonds issued or to be issued to represent unpaid assessment, or both (a) and (b), may be sold as the legislative body directs and the purchaser, and any successors, shall thereupon succeed to all of the rights and liens of the city.

If the work and improvement consists, in part, of a conversion and, in part, of other types of work or improvement, the legislative body may provide in the resolution of intention that the costs and expenses of conversion shall constititute part of the incidental expenses to be advanced to the city by the contractor and to be included in the assessment. Any incidental expenses so advanced to the city may be retained by the city for the purpose of paying or reimbursing the city for the cost of such conversion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.14.

(a) Subject to applicable rules, regulations, tariffs, or ordinances, all electric or communication facilities, including connections to the owner’s premises, located upon any lot or parcel of land within the assessment district shall be constructed, reconstructed, relocated, or converted by the owner of the lot or parcel at his or her own expense. This work may be done by the contractor, or the public utility, cable operator, public agency, or city performing the conversion work, and the cost thereof included in the assessment to be levied upon the lot or parcel, provided that the owner shall execute a written request therefor and file it with the clerk. Any such request shall expressly authorize the contractor, public utility, cable operator, public agency, or city, and the respective
 officers, agents, and employees of each, to enter upon the lot or parcel for that purpose and shall waive any right of protest or objection in respect of the doing of that work and the inclusion of the cost thereof in the assessment.

(b) The provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to diminish any right of an owner of a lot or parcel of land to contract any portion of work on his or her premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 792, Sec. 6.   (AB 1145)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.15.

Any written request executed pursuant to Section 5896.14 shall be filed with the clerk not later than the date fixed for commencement of construction of the conversion. A written request executed after such date shall not be accepted for filing by the clerk unless it shall contain the written approval of the contractor, public utility, public agency or city which is authorized to perform such work or improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.16.

The clerk shall mail a notice to each owner of a lot or parcel of land within the assessment district advising him of the provisions of Sections 5896.14 and 5896.15 and stating that unless such owner complies with the requirements of such sections all buildings, structures and improvements located upon the lot or parcel will be subject to disconnection from the electric or communication facilities providing service thereto. Such notice shall be mailed at least 15 days prior to the date of commencement of construction and shall be mailed to the owners whose names and addresses appear on the last equalized assessment roll used by the city or as known to the clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

5896.17.

If the owner of any lot or parcel of land shall fail to comply with the requirements of Sections 5896.14 and 5896.15, the city may order the disconnection and removal of all overhead electric or communication facilities providing service to any building, structure or improvement located upon such lot or parcel. Written notice of proposed disconnection shall be given at least five days prior to disconnection by leaving a copy of such notice at the principal building, structure or improvement located upon such lot or parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 29. Contractual Assessments [5898.10. - 5899.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5898.10. - 5898.18.]

5898.10.

This chapter provides an alternative procedure for authorizing assessments to finance any work which may be done pursuant to this division. The terms and definitions of this division apply to this chapter, except as otherwise provided. The Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation, and Majority Protest Act of 1931 (Division 4 (commencing with Section 2800)) does not apply to any proceedings taken under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5898.12.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that this chapter should be used to finance public improvements to lots or parcels that are developed and where the costs and time delays involved in creating an assessment district pursuant to other provisions of this division or any other law would be prohibitively large relative to the cost of the public improvements to be financed.

(b) It is also the intent of the Legislature that this chapter should be used to finance the installation or prepaid service contract, or both, of distributed generation renewable energy sources or energy efficiency
 improvements that are permanently fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property.

(c) It is also the intent of the Legislature to address chronic water needs throughout California by permitting voluntary individual efforts to improve water efficiency. The Legislature further intends that this chapter should be used to finance the installation of water efficiency improvements that are permanently fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property, including, but not limited to, recycled water connections, synthetic turf, cisterns for stormwater recovery, and permeable pavement.

(d) It is also the intent of the Legislature that a public agency in the process of establishing an assessment program, to the extent feasible,
 use a good faith effort to provide advance notice of the proposed program to water and electric service providers in the relevant service area, as set forth in Section 5898.24, to allow the most efficient coordination and collaboration between the public agency and water and electric service providers.

(e) This chapter shall not be used to finance facilities for parcels in connection with the initial construction of a residential building, unless the initial construction is undertaken by the intended owner or occupant.

(f) This chapter shall not be used to finance the purchase or installation of appliances that are not permanently fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property.

(g) Assessments may be levied pursuant to this chapter only with the free and willing consent of the owner of each lot or parcel on which an assessment is levied at the time the assessment is levied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 599, Sec. 2.   (AB 1883)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5898.14.

(a) The Legislature finds all of the following:

(1) Energy and water conservation efforts, including the promotion of energy efficiency improvements to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property are necessary to address the issue of global climate change.

(2) The upfront cost of making residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property more energy and water efficient prevents many property owners from making those improvements. To make those improvements more affordable and to promote the installation of those improvements, it is necessary to authorize an alternative procedure for authorizing assessments to finance the cost of energy and water efficiency improvements.

(b) The Legislature declares that a public purpose will be served by a voluntary contractual assessment program that provides the legislative body of any public agency with the authority to finance the installation of distributed generation renewable energy sources and energy or water efficiency improvements that are permanently fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 444, Sec. 3.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5898.15.

(a) A public agency shall not permit a property owner to participate in any program established pursuant to this chapter if the owner’s participation would result in the total amount of any annual property taxes and assessments exceeding 5 percent of the property’s market value, as determined at the time of approval of the owner’s contractual assessment.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to void or otherwise release a property owner from the contractual obligations incurred by a contractual assessment on a property, particularly in the event that the total amount of annual property taxes and assessments exceeds 5 percent of a property’s market value after the property owner has entered into a contractual
 assessment pursuant to this chapter.

(c) This section applies to a property owner who seeks to participate in a program established pursuant to this chapter for types of property not subject to the requirements of Sections 5898.16 and 5898.17.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 618, Sec. 3.   (AB 2693)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5898.16.

(a) A public agency shall not permit a property owner to participate in any program established pursuant to this chapter for the purposes specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899, 5899.3, or 5899.4 if any of the following apply:

(1) The property owner’s participation would result in the total amount of the annual property taxes and assessments exceeding 5 percent of the property’s market value, as determined at the time of approval of the property owner’s contractual assessment.

(2) The property does not comply with the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, and paragraph (8), and, in addition, for properties with energy efficiency
 improvements specified under Section 5898.20 of this code and paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 26063 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) A public agency shall not permit the property owner to participate in any program established pursuant to this chapter for the purposes specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899, 5899.3, or 5899.4 unless the property owner is given the right to cancel the contractual assessment without penalty or obligation, consistent with the following:

(1) (A) The property owner shall receive the right to cancel document set forth below or a substantially similar document that displays the same information in a substantially similar format. The document shall be provided to the property owner as a printed copy unless the property owner agrees to an electronic copy.Right to CancelProperty Owner: [Owner Full Name],[Phone],[Email] Property Address: [Property Address] 

Your Right to Cancel:

You are entering into a contractual assessment with [Provider] for financing that will result in a lien on the property at [Property
 Address]. You may cancel this transaction, without cost, on or before midnight on the third business day after whichever of the following events occurs last:(1) The date on which you signed the contractual assessment.(2) The date you received your Financing Estimate and Disclosure.(3) The date you received this notice of your right to cancel.If you cancel the transaction, [Provider], within 20 calendar days after [Provider] receives notice of cancellation, must take the steps necessary to reflect the fact that, if recorded, the lien on your property has been discharged and removed from the tax rolls, and
 [Provider] must return to you any money you have given in connection with your application, not including the application processing fee. After [Provider] has done the things mentioned above, you must return any money paid to you or on your behalf, whether to your contractor or any other person. All money must be returned to the address below.

If you cancel the transaction:●You will not be charged a cancellation fee; and●You will be refunded any money you have given, excluding application and processing fees as applicable.To cancel this transaction, you may submit this form to [Provider] in writing at:Provider:__________Attn:Right to Cancel NotificationEmail:__________Fax number:__________Address:__________Deadline to Cancel:If you want to cancel this transaction, you must submit this form on or before midnight on the third business day after whichever of the following events occurs last:(1) The date on which you signed the contractual assessment.(2) The
 date you received your Financing Estimate and Disclosure.(3) The date you received this notice of your right to cancel.You may use any written statement that is signed and dated by you and states your intention to cancel, or you may use this notice by dating and signing below. If you cancel by mail, fax, or email, you must send the notice no later than midnight of the third business day following the date on which you signed the contractual assessment. If you send or deliver your written notice to cancel some other way, it must be delivered to the above address no later than midnight on the third business day after whichever of the following events occurs last:(1) The date on which you signed the contractual assessment.(2) The date you received your Financing Estimate and Disclosure.(3) The date you received this notice of your right to cancel.I WISH TO CANCELProperty Owner Date(B) References to “third” in the notice to cancel document set forth in subparagraph (A) shall be changed to
 “fifth” for a property owner who is a senior citizen.

(C) The five-day right to cancel added by the act that added subparagraph (B) to this paragraph shall apply to a contractual assessment entered into on or after January 1, 2021.

(2) The property owner is deemed to have given notice of cancellation at the moment that the property owner sends the notice by mail, email, or fax or at the moment that the property owner otherwise delivers the notice, as applicable.

(c) This section only applies to a property owner who seeks to participate in a program established pursuant to this chapter for the purposes specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899, 5899.3, or 5899.4 for a residential property with four or fewer units.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Property owner” shall include all owners of record.

(2) “Senior citizen” means an individual who is 65 years of age or older.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2020, Ch. 158, Sec. 11.   (AB 2471)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.    See later operative version amended by Sec. 12 of Stats. 2020, Ch. 158.)
-------------------------------------------

5898.16.

(a) A public agency shall not permit a property owner to participate in any program established pursuant to this chapter for the purposes specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899 or 5899.3 if any of the following apply:

(1) The property owner’s participation would result in the total amount of the annual property taxes and assessments exceeding 5 percent of the property’s market value, as determined at the time of approval of the property owner’s contractual assessment.

(2) The property does not comply with the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, and paragraph (8), and, in addition, for properties with energy efficiency improvements
 specified under Section 5898.20 of this code and paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 26063 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) A public agency shall not permit the property owner to participate in any program established pursuant to this chapter for the purposes specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899 or 5899.3 unless the property owner is given the right to cancel the contractual assessment without penalty or obligation, consistent with the following:

(1) (A) The property owner shall receive the right to cancel document set forth below or a substantially similar document that displays the same information in a substantially similar format. The document shall be provided to the property owner as a printed copy unless the property owner agrees to an electronic copy.Right to CancelProperty Owner: [Owner Full Name],[Phone],[Email] Property Address: [Property Address] 

Your Right to Cancel:

You are entering into a contractual assessment with [Provider] for financing that will result in a lien on the property at [Property
 Address]. You may cancel this transaction, without cost, on or before midnight on the third business day after whichever of the following events occurs last:(1) The date on which you signed the contractual assessment.(2) The date you received your Financing Estimate and Disclosure.(3) The date you received this notice of your right to cancel.If you cancel the transaction, [Provider], within 20 calendar days after [Provider] receives notice of cancellation, must take the steps necessary to reflect the fact that, if recorded, the lien on your property has been discharged and removed from the tax rolls, and
 [Provider] must return to you any money you have given in connection with your application, not including the application processing fee. After [Provider] has done the things mentioned above, you must return any money paid to you or on your behalf, whether to your contractor or any other person. All money must be returned to the address below.

If you cancel the transaction:●You will not be charged a cancellation fee; and●You will be refunded any money you have given, excluding application and processing fees as applicable.To cancel this transaction, you may submit this form to [Provider] in writing at:Provider:__________Attn:Right to Cancel NotificationEmail:__________Fax number:__________Address:__________Deadline to Cancel:If you want to cancel this transaction, you must submit this form on or before midnight on the third business day after whichever of the following events occurs last:(1) The date on which you signed the contractual assessment.(2) The
 date you received your Financing Estimate and Disclosure.(3) The date you received this notice of your right to cancel.You may use any written statement that is signed and dated by you and states your intention to cancel, or you may use this notice by dating and signing below. If you cancel by mail, fax, or email, you must send the notice no later than midnight of the third business day following the date on which you signed the contractual assessment. If you send or deliver your written notice to cancel some other way, it must be delivered to the above address no later than midnight on the third business day after whichever of the following events occurs last:(1) The date on which you signed the contractual assessment.(2) The date you received your Financing Estimate and Disclosure.(3) The date you received this notice of your right to cancel.I WISH TO CANCELProperty Owner Date(B) References to “third” in the notice to cancel document set forth in subparagraph (A) shall be changed to
 “fifth” for a property owner who is a senior citizen.

(C) The five-day right to cancel added by the act that added subparagraph (B) to this paragraph shall apply to a contractual assessment entered into on or after January 1, 2021.

(2) The property owner is deemed to have given notice of cancellation at the moment that the property owner sends the notice by mail, email, or fax or at the moment that the property owner otherwise delivers the notice, as applicable.

(c) This section only applies to a property owner who seeks to participate in a program established pursuant to this chapter for the purposes specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899 or 5899.3 for a residential property with four or fewer units.

(d) For
 the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

 (1) “Property owner” shall include all owners of record.

(2) “Senior citizen” means an individual who is 65 years of age or older.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837, Sec. 9) by Stats. 2020, Ch. 158, Sec. 12.   (AB 2471)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Section operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5898.17.

(a) The disclosure set forth below, or a substantially equivalent document that displays the same information in a substantially similar format, shall be completed and delivered to a property owner before the property owner consummates a voluntary contractual assessment described in this chapter for purposes specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899, 5899.3, or 5899.4, or a special tax described in Section 53328.1 of the Government Code. The disclosure shall be provided to the property owner as a printed paper copy in no smaller than 12-point type, unless the property owner opts out of receiving a printed paper copy in writing by signing a printed paper document. A property owner who opts out of receiving a printed paper copy of the disclosure shall be provided with an electronic copy in
 accordance with the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code). A sample of the disclosure set forth below shall be maintained on a public internet website available to property owners.

(b) (1) This section only applies to disclosure to a property owner who seeks to participate in a program established pursuant to this chapter for the purposes specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899, 5899.3, or 5899.4 for a residential property with four or fewer units.Financing Estimate and DisclosureNotice to Property Owner: